District of Columbia statutes.
25-741

Go-cups and back-up drinks prohibited.

(a)

The licensee under an off-premises retailer’s license, class A or B, shall not provide go-cups to customers.

(b)

The licensee under an on-premises retailer’s license shall not serve back-up drinks to customers.

History

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959

Section References

This section is referenced in § 25-123.